test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-4lex_adelistid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests: 

  Verb - adelistiđ: # MLO checked
    adelistiđ+V+Inf: adelistiđ
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adelistám 
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: adelistáh
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: adelist 
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: adelisteen
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: adelistvettee
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: adelistev
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: adelistep
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: adelistvetteđ
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: adelisteh
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: adelistim
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: adelistih
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: adelistij
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: adelistijm
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: adelistijd
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: adelistijn
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: adelistijm
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: adelistijd
    adelistiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: adelistii
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: adelisteem
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: adelisteeh
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: adelistiš
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: adelistižeen
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: adelistišvettee
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: adelistižává
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: adelistižep
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: adelistišvetteđ
    adelistiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: adelistižeh
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: adelist
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: adelistus
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: adelistoon
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: adelistee
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: adelistus
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: adelistop
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: adelistiđ
    adelistiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: adelistus
    
    
#  Verb - uápásmittiđ: # MLO checked
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Inf: uápásmittiđ
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápásmitám 
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uápásmitáh
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uápásmit 
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uápásmitteen
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uápásmitvettee
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uápásmittev
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uápásmittep
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uápásmitvetteđ
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uápásmitteh
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uápásmittim
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uápásmittih
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uápásmitij
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uápásmitijm
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uápásmitijd
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uápásmitijn
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uápásmitijm
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uápásmitijd
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uápásmittii
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uápásmitteem
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uápásmitteeh
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uápásmitiš
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: uápásmitižeen
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: uápásmitišvettee
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: uápásmitižává
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: uápásmitižep
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: uápásmitišvetteđ
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: uápásmitižeh
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uápásmit
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uápásmittus
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uápásmittoon
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uápásmittee
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uápásmittus
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uápásmittop
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uápásmittiđ
#    uápásmittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uápásmittus
